Utah statutes.
58-17b-606.   Restrictive drug formulary prohibited.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Generic form" means a prescription drug that is available in generic
form and has an A rating in the United States Pharmacopeia and Drug Index.
(b)  "Legend drug" means any drug that requires a prescription under state or
federal law.
(c)  "Restrictive drug formulary" means a list of legend drugs, other than
drugs for cosmetic purposes, that are prohibited by the Department of Health
from dispensation, but are approved by the Federal Food and Drug
Administration.
(2)  A practitioner may prescribe legend drugs in accordance with this chapter
that, in his professional judgment and within the lawful scope of his
practice, he considers appropriate for the diagnosis and treatment of his
patient.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the Department of Health may not
maintain a restrictive drug formulary that restricts a physician's ability to
treat a patient with a legend drug that has been approved and designated as
safe and effective by the Federal Food and Drug Administration, except for
drugs for cosmetic purposes.
(4)  When a multisource legend drug is available in the generic form, the
Department of Health may only reimburse for the generic form of the drug
unless the treating physician demonstrates to the Department of Health a
medical necessity for dispensing the nongeneric, brand-name legend drug.
(5)  The Department of Health pharmacists may override the generic mandate
provisions of Subsection (4) if a financial benefit will accrue to the state.
(6)  This section does not affect the state's ability to exercise the
exclusion options available under the Federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation
Act of 1990.
